errortag-src/adv-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON gadv ! adv that can form compounds
+Adv:%> R ;
adv ;

LEXICON adv
+Adv:%>0 K ;

LEXICON CSadv
+Adv:%>0 # ;


LEXICON adv-comp
+Adv+Comp:%>0 K ;

LEXICON adv-sup
+Adv+Superl:%>0 K ;

LEXICON IHTTAS
+Adv:ž JOHTOLAT0 ; ! Sg Nom -> K, R
+Adv+Ess:ž%>an K ;
+Adv+Sg+Gen:ž%>a K ;
+Adv+Sg+Ill:ž%>ij K ;
+Adv+Sg+Loc:ž%>is K ;
+Adv+Sg+Com:ž%>ijn K ;
+Adv+Pl+Gen:ž%>ijd9 K ;
+Adv+Pl+Ill:ž%>ijdda K ;
+Adv+Pl+Loc:ž%>ijn K ;
+Adv+Pl+Com:ž%>ijgujn K ;

!LEXICON DABBELAS
!+Adv+Sg+Nom:š%> K ; ! no 
!+Adv:žža DABBELACCA- ;
!
!LEXICON DABBELACCA-
!! Modulating ISSORASSA- here, but avoiding double Adv tag.
!! Removed everything save the grammatical cases.
!+Ess:%>n K ;
!:%>X4t K ;		    ! BU/MUS entry, without 
!+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
!+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
!+Sg+Loc:%>X8s K ;
!+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
!+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;




LEXICON COMPADV
:%>t adv ;

LEXICON SUPADVmus
:%>mus adv-sup ;

LEXICON SUPADVmusj
:%>muš adv ;


! Some removed ones
!maŋemuččas adv ;
!maŋemužžii adv ;
!diebbelačča adv ;
!diebbelaččas adv ;
!diebbelažžii adv ;
!dobbelačča adv ;
!dobbelaččas adv ;
!dobbelažžii adv ;
!duobbelačča adv ;
!duobbelaččas adv ;
!duobbelažžii adv ;
!dábbelačča adv ;
!dábbelaččas adv ;
!dábbelažžii adv ;
!maŋŋelačča adv ;
!maŋŋelaččas adv ;
!maŋŋelažžii adv ;
!!odnáš:ž adv ; ! ":ž" is wrong, and "odnáš" not in dict.
!!oppalaččat adv ;
!ovdalačča adv ;
!ovdalaččas adv ;
!ovdalažžii adv ;
!!dađisdaga adv ; is wrong with d

LEXICON Adverb
olggo#bealde adv ;
agi#beaivvesge CSadv ;
agi#beaivvisge CSadv ;
lovssufáste+Use/Sub:lovssufáste adv; !
agás adv ;
ain#juo adv ;
aivvo adv ;
akto adv ;
albmosii adv ;
alddage CSadv ;
alibužžii adv ;
allelaččat adv ;
allin adv ;
almmatge CSadv ;
almmotge CSadv ;
altteson CSadv ;
aŋaldagas adv ;
asehis#gerddiid:asehis#gerddijd9 adv ;
bárralagaid:bárralagajd9 adv ;
badje#badjálagaid+Use/Sub:badje#badjálagajd9 adv ; !
badjeleamos adv ;
badjel#mearálaččat adv ;
badjálaga adv ;
bahuin adv ;
bai#fáhkka+Use/Sub:bai#fáhkka adv; !
bajibus adv ;
bajá#geaže adv ;
beaive#guovdil adv ;
beald:beald9 adv ;
bealle#heakkas adv ;
bealle#vearta adv ;
bereval+Use/Sub:bereval adv; ! !Southern dialect
beavddimussii adv ;
beavžža#bealde adv ;
bevnnot adv ;
biehčamahttá adv ;
birolaččat adv ;
birra#jorbalassii adv ;
birzzehasat adv ;
boaitto#beale adv ;
goas#nu+Use/Sub:goas#nu adv; !
boaššul adv ;
bođohagaid:bođohagajd9 adv ;
bodnelis adv ;
boššo#bealde adv ;
botnibus adv ;
buođđagassii adv ;
buokčagasas adv ;
buošágit adv ;
alddáge CSadv ;
áibbasrat CSadv ;
álgage CSadv ;
buotrat CSadv ;
buotrahkan CSadv ;
dállai CSadv ;
dahjerat CSadv ;
huirat CSadv ;
mallesge CSadv ;
nabai CSadv ;
obarat CSadv ;
ollurat CSadv ;
báhtarusas adv ;
báikkuid:báikkujd9 adv ;
báldal adv ;
bálddalas#julggiid:bálddalas#julggijd9 adv ;
bárrahiin adv ;
čahpunassii adv ;
čalmmálassii adv ;
čeahpálaga adv ;
čiehkagasas adv ;
čikŋagassii adv ;
čirssil adv ;
čomal adv ;
čoruid:čorujd9 adv ;
čuožžut adv ;
caggasii adv ;
ceahkkálaga adv ;
cuoccit adv ;
dađi adv ;
dađi#bahábut adv-comp ;
dainna#lágiin+Use/Sub:dainna#lágiin adv; !
dal adv ;
danne adv ;
dassážiidda adv ;
dastán adv ;
davil adv ;
davveleppožis adv ;
davvil adv ;
davá#geahčen adv ;
dearpamassii adv ;
dehal CSadv ;
desto adv ;
dieđun+Use/Sub:dieđun adv; !
doppe gadv ;
dieppe gadv ;
diehpil adv ;
dieigo adv ;
dieppit:dieppi COMPADV ;
dieppimus:dieppi SUPADVmus ;
dieppimuš:dieppi SUPADVmusj ;
dieppimustá adv-sup ;
dieppánaga adv ;
dievamus adv-sup ;
dillat adv ;
divuhussii adv ;
doama-doama adv ;
doarggat#gaccaid:doarggat#gaccajd9 adv ;
dobbelis adv ;
dohko adv ;
dolggal adv ;
dolágo CSadv ;
doppit:doppi COMPADV ;
doppimus:doppi SUPADVmus ;
doppimuš:doppi SUPADVmusj ;
doppimustá adv-sup ;
dovdduheamet adv ;
duhtamassii adv ;
duobbelis adv ;
duohččagassii adv ;
duohta#váimmus adv-sup ;
duohttáge CSadv ;
duoihuodjin adv ;
duolbut adv-comp ;
duoppe adv ;
duoppe gadv ;
duoppit:duoppi COMPADV ;
duoppimus:duoppi SUPADVmus ;
duoppimuš:duoppi SUPADVmusj ;
duoppimustá adv-sup ;
duššiid:duššijd9 adv ;
dá#dalle+Use/Sub:dá#dalle adv; !
dákko adv ;
dáppe adv ;
dáppe gadv ;
dáppit:dáppi COMPADV ;
dáppimus:dáppi SUPADVmus ;
dáppimuš:dáppi SUPADVmusj ;
dáppimustá adv-sup ;
dásttánaga adv ;
eambo adv ; 
eanebuš adv-comp ;
eara#sajes+Use/Sub:eara#sajes adv; !
eará#láhkái+Use/Sub:eará#láhkái adv; !
eisege CSadv ;
eksplisihtalaččat adv ;
farga adv ;
farggamusat adv-sup ;
ferot adv ;
fáhkal adv ;
fátmálaga adv ;
fávlla#beallai adv ;
fávllimus adv-sup ;
gait adv ;
ganjal#čalmmiid:ganjal#čalmmijd9 adv ;
gaskat adv ;
geahčen adv ;
geasibui adv ;
geavrut adv ;
giehpanaga adv ;
gilgalagaid:gilgalagajd9 adv ;
globálalaččat adv ;
goabbasiige CSadv ;
goabbasisge CSadv ;
goabbeliige CSadv ;
goabbelisge CSadv ;
goabbilge CSadv ;
goappilge CSadv ;
goappos adv ;
goasses adv ;
goassege CSadv ; !dis prefers goasse + ge Foc, but MT Adv. Now testin gXXX
goassige CSadv ;
goitge CSadv ;
gokkonai CSadv ;
gokte adv ;
goktege CSadv ;
gomot adv ;
gostege CSadv ;
gostige CSadv ;
got adv ;
guhkibui adv ;
guhkebuš adv-comp ;
guhkkin adv ;
guhkásgo CSadv ; ! Deviant, 
guittotge CSadv ;
gulá#muddui adv ;
guorosnaga adv ;
guovdolis adv ;
guvrut adv ;
gáddolagaid:gáddolagajd9 adv ;
gárragii adv ;
gátta#beallai adv ;
heahpatmeahttumit adv ;
hiljážii adv ;
huhttagassii adv ;
háŋkalaga adv ;
iđis adv ;
ieš#heanalis adv ;
ihttánaga adv ;
ihttáš:ihttá IHTTAS ;
ille adv ;
irggeš adv ;
jeavddalaččat adv ;
jitnoseabbot adv-comp ;
jogo CSadv ;
johtileappot adv ;
joksege CSadv ;
juoba adv ;
juogo CSadv ;
jálut#beliid:jálut#belijd9 adv ;
káffenaga adv ;
lahkosis adv ;
leabbut adv-comp ;
leaikkas adv ;
lihpebadjái adv ;
loamil adv ;
čuođenáre adv ;
loidolis adv ;
lulibuidda adv ;
lulá#bealde adv ;
luohttalagaid:luohttalagajd9 adv ;
láddasis adv ;
láigomassii+Use/Sub:láigomassii adv; !
lávgalagaid:lávgalagajd9 adv ;
maiddái+Use/NG:maiddai adv ;
makkárge CSadv ;
mallosge CSadv ;
maŋemus adv-sup ;
maŋimus adv-sup ;
maŋimustá adv-sup ;
maŋimuštá adv-sup ;
maŋŋeleppožii adv ;
maŋŋá#sanatis+Use/Sub:maŋŋá#sanatis adv; !
maŋážassii adv ;
maninge CSadv ;
mannege CSadv ;
meahccáiaga adv ;
mehco#bealde adv ;
miehte#gulgii adv ;
ieš#mielas adv ;
mihus adv ;
moson CSadv ;
moddii adv ;
moktege CSadv ;
moktige CSadv ;
muhtemin adv ;
máddelabbos adv ;
máddugit adv ;
mátta#beale adv ;
naba CSadv ;
nabason CSadv ;
nađo adv ;
nago CSadv ;
niehka#beallai adv ;
njalput adv ;
njeljiid% njeljiid:njeljiid% njeljijd9 adv ;
njozet adv ;
njuolggabut adv ;
njáikkal adv ;
nohkka adv ;
nuortalačča adv ;
nuortas#davás adv ;
nuppe#aivve+Use/Sub:nuppe#aivve adv; !
nágga adv ;
oallásahttá adv ;
oarjeleappos adv ;
oarjja#geahčen adv ;
oažžun#sadjái+Use/Sub:oažžun#sadjái adv; !
odne adv ;
okte adv ;
oktege CSadv ;
oktiige CSadv ;
olahahkii adv ;
olgolačča adv ;
ollege CSadv ;
ollenge CSadv ;
ollodahkii adv ;
oppanassii adv ;
ovdalebbui adv ;
ovdda#geahčai adv ;
ovddemus adv-sup ;
ovddemusat adv-sup ;
ovddemustá adv-sup ;
ovddimustá adv-sup ;
ovddimus adv-sup ;
ovstalis adv ;
ovttas#ráđiid:ovttas#ráđijd9 adv ;
raddálaga adv ;
rastá gadv ;
ravdaleppožis adv ;
riddolaččas. adv ;
riektadit adv ; !MT
roaibut adv-comp ;
roamššil adv ;
ruibut adv-comp ;
ruošša#bealde+Use/Sub:ruošša#bealde adv; !
ruvžžal adv ;
ráigge adv ;
šnjorrosii adv ;
seahkálaga adv ;
seaiga adv ;
sealgil adv ;
sidjii adv ;
sierra gadv ;
sisabus adv ;
siskil adv ;
skavžžil adv ;
skuibut adv-comp ;
smarvvil adv ;
snáittil adv ;
soggeleppožis adv ;
sparrolagaid:sparrolagajd9 adv ;
sullii adv ;
suollemasat adv ;
sálbut adv-comp ;
sárdnumassii adv ;
uhcibut adv-comp ;
uhcimus adv-sup ;
uhcimusat adv-sup ;
uhcimusge CSadv ;
uhcimustá adv-sup ;
uhcánaš adv ;
uksalis adv ;
unnibut adv-comp ;
unnimus adv-sup ;
unnimusat adv-sup ;
unnimustá adv-sup ;
uskeliidda adv ;
vajos adv ;
vasedihte adv ;
veaháš adv ;
veastalii adv ;
vel adv ;
velábusnai CSadv ;
viesttar#beallai adv ;
viidásit adv ;
vuhkohagaid:vuhkohagajd9 adv ;
vuohkkasit adv ;
vuolibuš adv-comp ;
vuolimus adv-sup ;
vuollel adv ;
vuollin adv ;
vuordagasas adv ;
vuoste#rávdnjái adv ;
vuosttamustá adv-sup ;
vuostálagaid:vuostálagajd9 adv ;
vuotton adv ;
vádjit adv ;
vári adv ;
várril adv ;
áđamusat adv-sup ;
áiggelassii adv ;
álebuš adv-comp ;
álggage CSadv ;
álggo#geahčai+Use/Sub:álggo#geahčai adv; !
álguige CSadv ;
álgáge CSadv ;
álot adv ;
árabuš adv-comp ;
ávjolassii adv ;
dobbelačča adv ;
álkibut adv-comp ;
álkimusat adv-sup ;
álkit adv ;
bahábut adv-comp ;
bahámusat adv-sup ;
buorebut adv-comp ;
buoremusat adv-sup ;
hoahpubut adv-comp ;
hoahpumusat adv-sup ;
siivobut adv-comp ;
siivomusat adv-sup ;
siivvubut adv-comp ;
siivvumusat adv-sup ;
vearrábut adv-comp ;
vearábut adv-comp ;
vearrámusat adv-sup ;
vearámusat adv-sup ;
julggabut adv-comp ;
julggamus adv-sup ;
julggamusat adv-sup ;
sakkabut adv-comp ;
sakkamusat adv-sup ;
stuoribut adv-comp ;
stuorimusat adv-sup ;
stuorimustá adv-sup ;
eanemus adv-sup ;
eanemusat adv-sup ;
eanemustá adv-sup ;
eanet adv-comp ;
eanot+Use/Sub:eanot adv-comp; !
fargga adv ;
farggamus adv-sup ; 
farggamusat adv-sup ;
hárvvibut adv-comp ;
hárvvimusat adv-sup ;
hárvvit adv-comp ;
rievttabut adv-comp ;
rievttamus adv-sup ;
lagabut adv-comp ;
lagat adv-comp ;
árabut adv-comp ;
áramus adv-sup ;
áramusat adv-sup ;
áramustá adv-sup ;
árat adv-comp ;
guhkimus adv-sup ;
guhkimusat adv-sup ;
guhkimustá adv-sup ;
guhkibut adv-comp ;
dávjábut adv-comp ;
dávjámusat adv-sup ;
dávjjibut adv-comp ;
dávjjimus adv-sup ;
dávjjimustá adv-sup ;
dárkkibut adv-comp ;
dárkkit adv-comp ;
dárkkimusat adv-sup ;
